Hawaii statutes.
§431:21-109 Insurance coverages available
under plan. (a) All properties qualifying for coverage under the plan of
operation shall be eligible for the standard fire policy and extended coverage
endorsement. The association shall provide additional coverages when directed
by the commissioner or when approved by the commissioner.

(b) At the written request of any person who
is, or is attempting to become, a mortgagor on real property that qualifies for
coverage under the plan of operation, the association shall provide coverage
for an amount not less than the amount of the mortgage obligation, but no
greater than the value of the property being insured; provided that it does not
exceed the limits of the plan. The policy shall name the intended mortgagee as
the beneficiary for the amount equal to the outstanding balance on the
mortgage.

(c) In the application of subsection (b), the
amount covered under the policy shall comply with article 10E. [L 1991, c 284,
pt of §2; am L 1997, c 14, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next